Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1139.
do enact as follows:AB1139,11Section 1. 704.05 (5) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1139,2,122704.05 (5) (a) 1. If a tenant removes from or is evicted from the premises and 3leaves personal property, the landlord may presume, in the absence of a written 4agreement between the landlord and the tenant to the contrary or any indication 5from the tenant that the personal property is not abandoned, that the tenant has 6abandoned the personal property and may, subject to par. (am) and s. 799.45 (3m), 7dispose of the abandoned personal property in any manner that the landlord, in its 8sole discretion, determines is appropriate. If the tenant has given any indication 9that the personal property is not abandoned, the landlord shall comply with s. 10704.05, 2009 stats., with respect to any personal property left behind by the tenant 11when the tenant removes from the premises, or if the tenant is evicted from the 12premises and the landlord notifies the sheriff under s. 799.45 (3m).AB1139,213Section 2. 704.05 (5) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB1139,2,1814704.05 (5) (d) Cost to tenant of landlord’s disposal of personal property. A 15landlord may not charge to a tenant more than a reasonable rate, as determined by 16the department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection by rule, for removing, 17disposing of, selling, or storing the tenant’s personal property after the tenant 18removes from the premises.AB1139,2,1919